Illinois, session 104th, HB5036.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Sections 3, 8, 9, and 10 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 523)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. Unless the context otherwise 8requires, the following words and phrases as used in this Act 9shall have the following meanings. The Department may define 10these and other words and phrases separately for the purpose 11of implementing specific programs providing benefits under 12this Act.13    (a) "Administrative service organization" means any 14person, firm, or corporation experienced in the handling of 15claims which is fully qualified, financially sound, and 16capable of meeting the service requirements of a contract of 17administration executed with the Department.18    (b) "Annuitant" means (1) an employee who retires, or has 19retired, on or after January 1, 1966 on an immediate annuity 20under the provisions of Articles 2, 14 (including an employee 21who has elected to receive an alternative retirement 22cancellation payment under Section 14-108.5 of the Illinois 23Pension Code in lieu of an annuity or who meets the criteria   HB5036- 2 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1for retirement, but in lieu of receiving an annuity under that 2Article has elected to receive an accelerated pension benefit 3payment under Section 14-147.5 of that Article), 15 (including 4an employee who has retired under the optional retirement 5program established under Section 15-158.2 or who meets the 6criteria for retirement but in lieu of receiving an annuity 7under that Article has elected to receive an accelerated 8pension benefit payment under Section 15-185.5 of the 9Article), paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106 10(including an employee who meets the criteria for retirement, 11but in lieu of receiving an annuity under that Article has 12elected to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment 13under Section 16-190.5 of the Illinois Pension Code), or 14Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code; (2) any person who was 15receiving group insurance coverage under this Act as of March 1631, 1978 by reason of his status as an annuitant, even though 17the annuity in relation to which such coverage was provided is 18a proportional annuity based on less than the minimum period 19of service required for a retirement annuity in the system 20involved; (3) any person not otherwise covered by this Act who 21has retired as a participating member under Article 2 of the 22Illinois Pension Code but is ineligible for the retirement 23annuity under Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code; (4) 24the spouse of any person who is receiving a retirement annuity 25under Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code and who is 26covered under a group health insurance program sponsored by a   HB5036- 3 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1governmental employer other than the State of Illinois and who 2has irrevocably elected to waive his or her coverage under 3this Act and to have his or her spouse considered as the 4"annuitant" under this Act and not as a "dependent"; or (5) an 5employee who retires, or has retired, from a qualified 6position, as determined according to rules promulgated by the 7Director, under a qualified local government, a qualified 8rehabilitation facility, a qualified domestic violence shelter 9or service, or a qualified child advocacy center. (For 10definition of "retired employee", see subsection (p)).11    (b-5) (Blank).12    (b-6) (Blank).13    (b-7) (Blank).14    (c) "Carrier" means (1) an insurance company, a 15corporation organized under the Limited Health Service 16Organization Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act, a 17partnership, or other nongovernmental organization, which is 18authorized to do group life or group health insurance business 19in Illinois, or (2) the State of Illinois as a self-insurer.20    (d) "Compensation" means salary or wages payable on a 21regular payroll by the State Treasurer on a warrant of the 22State Comptroller out of any State, trust or federal fund, or 23by the Governor of the State through a disbursing officer of 24the State out of a trust or out of federal funds, or by any 25Department out of State, trust, federal, or other funds held 26by the State Treasurer or the Department, to any person for   HB5036- 4 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1personal services currently performed, and ordinary or 2accidental disability benefits under Articles 2, 14, 15 3(including ordinary or accidental disability benefits under 4the optional retirement program established under Section 515-158.2), paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106, or 6Article 18 of the Illinois Pension Code, for disability 7incurred after January 1, 1966, or benefits payable under the 8Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 9Diseases Act or benefits payable under a sick pay plan 10established in accordance with Section 36 of the State Finance 11Act. "Compensation" also means salary or wages paid to an 12employee of any qualified local government, qualified 13rehabilitation facility, qualified domestic violence shelter 14or service, or qualified child advocacy center.15    (e) "Commission" means the State Employees Group Insurance 16Advisory Commission authorized by this Act. Commencing July 1, 171984, "Commission" as used in this Act means the Commission on 18Government Forecasting and Accountability as established by 19the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act of 1984.20    (f) "Contributory", when referred to as contributory 21coverage, shall mean optional coverages or benefits elected by 22the member toward the cost of which such member makes 23contribution, or which are funded in whole or in part through 24the acceptance of a reduction in earnings or the foregoing of 25an increase in earnings by an employee, as distinguished from 26noncontributory coverage or benefits which are paid entirely   HB5036- 5 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1by the State of Illinois without reduction of the member's 2salary.3    (g) "Department" means any department, institution, board, 4commission, officer, court, or any agency of the State 5government receiving appropriations and having power to 6certify payrolls to the Comptroller authorizing payments of 7salary and wages against such appropriations as are made by 8the General Assembly from any State fund, or against trust 9funds held by the State Treasurer and includes boards of 10trustees of the retirement systems created by Articles 2, 14, 1115, 16, and 18 of the Illinois Pension Code. "Department" also 12includes the Illinois Comprehensive Health Insurance Board, 13the Board of Examiners established under the Illinois Public 14Accounting Act, and the Illinois Finance Authority.15    (h) "Dependent", when the term is used in the context of 16the health and life plan, means a member's spouse and any child 17(1) from birth to age 26, including an adopted child, a child 18who lives with the member from the time of the placement for 19adoption until entry of an order of adoption, a stepchild or 20adjudicated child, or a child who lives with the member if such 21member is a court appointed guardian of the child or (2) age 19 22or over who has a mental or physical disability from a cause 23originating prior to the age of 19 (age 26 if enrolled as an 24adult child dependent). For the health plan only, the term 25"dependent" also includes: (1) any person enrolled prior to 26the effective date of this Section who is dependent upon the   HB5036- 6 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1member to the extent that the member may claim such person as a 2dependent for income tax deduction purposes; and (2) any 3person who has received after June 30, 2000 an organ 4transplant and who is financially dependent upon the member 5and eligible to be claimed as a dependent for income tax 6purposes; and (3) any employee who is authorized to elect and 7has elected dependent status under subsection (c) of Section 8 8during the period when that election is in effect. A member 9requesting to cover any dependent must provide documentation 10as requested by the Department of Central Management Services 11and file with the Department any and all forms required by the 12Department. 13    (i) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois 14Department of Central Management Services.15    (j) "Eligibility period" means the period of time a member 16has to elect enrollment in programs or to select benefits 17without regard to age, sex, or health.18    (k) "Employee" means and includes each officer or employee 19in the service of a department who (1) receives his 20compensation for service rendered to the department on a 21warrant issued pursuant to a payroll certified by a department 22or on a warrant or check issued and drawn by a department upon 23a trust, federal or other fund or on a warrant issued pursuant 24to a payroll certified by an elected or duly appointed officer 25of the State or who receives payment of the performance of 26personal services on a warrant issued pursuant to a payroll   HB5036- 7 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1certified by a Department and drawn by the Comptroller upon 2the State Treasurer against appropriations made by the General 3Assembly from any fund or against trust funds held by the State 4Treasurer, and (2) is employed full-time or part-time in a 5position normally requiring actual performance of duty during 6not less than 1/2 of a normal work period, as established by 7the Director in cooperation with each department, except that 8persons elected by popular vote will be considered employees 9during the entire term for which they are elected regardless 10of hours devoted to the service of the State, and (3) except 11that "employee" does not include any person who is not 12eligible by reason of such person's employment to participate 13in one of the State retirement systems under Articles 2, 14, 15 14(either the regular Article 15 system or the optional 15retirement program established under Section 15-158.2), or 18, 16or under paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of Section 16-106, of the 17Illinois Pension Code, but such term does include persons who 18are employed during the 6-month qualifying period under 19Article 14 of the Illinois Pension Code. Such term also 20includes any person who (1) after January 1, 1966, is 21receiving ordinary or accidental disability benefits under 22Articles 2, 14, 15 (including ordinary or accidental 23disability benefits under the optional retirement program 24established under Section 15-158.2), paragraph (2), (3), or 25(5) of Section 16-106, or Article 18 of the Illinois Pension 26Code, for disability incurred after January 1, 1966, (2)   HB5036- 8 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1receives total permanent or total temporary disability under 2the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 3Diseases Act as a result of injuries sustained or illness 4contracted in the course of employment with the State of 5Illinois, or (3) is not otherwise covered under this Act and 6has retired as a participating member under Article 2 of the 7Illinois Pension Code but is ineligible for the retirement 8annuity under Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code. 9However, a person who satisfies the criteria of the foregoing 10definition of "employee" except that such person is made 11ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 12System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 13Illinois Pension Code is also an "employee" for the purposes 14of this Act. "Employee" also includes any person receiving or 15eligible for benefits under a sick pay plan established in 16accordance with Section 36 of the State Finance Act. 17"Employee" also includes (i) each officer or employee in the 18service of a qualified local government, including persons 19appointed as trustees of sanitary districts regardless of 20hours devoted to the service of the sanitary district, (ii) 21each employee in the service of a qualified rehabilitation 22facility, (iii) each full-time employee in the service of a 23qualified domestic violence shelter or service, and (iv) each 24full-time employee in the service of a qualified child 25advocacy center, as determined according to rules promulgated 26by the Director.  HB5036- 9 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    (l) "Member" means an employee, annuitant, retired 2employee, or survivor. In the case of an annuitant or retired 3employee who first becomes an annuitant or retired employee on 4or after January 13, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 597-668), the individual must meet the minimum vesting 6requirements of the applicable retirement system in order to 7be eligible for group insurance benefits under that system. In 8the case of a survivor who is not entitled to occupational 9death benefits pursuant to an applicable retirement system or 10death benefits pursuant to the Workers' Compensation Act, and 11who first becomes a survivor on or after January 13, 2012 (the 12effective date of Public Act 97-668), the deceased employee, 13annuitant, or retired employee upon whom the annuity is based 14must have been eligible to participate in the group insurance 15system under the applicable retirement system in order for the 16survivor to be eligible for group insurance benefits under 17that system. 18    For purposes of coverage under the program of group health 19benefits, "member" does not include any employee who is 20authorized to elect and has elected dependent status under 21subsection (c) of Section 8 during the period when that 22election is in effect. 23    In the case of a survivor who is entitled to occupational 24death benefits pursuant to the deceased employee's applicable 25retirement system or death benefits pursuant to the Workers' 26Compensation Act, and first becomes a survivor on or after   HB5036- 10 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1January 1, 2022, the survivor is eligible for group health 2insurance benefits regardless of the deceased employee's 3minimum vesting requirements under the applicable retirement 4system, with a State contribution rate of 100%, until an 5unmarried child dependent reaches the age of 18, or the age of 622 if the dependent child is a full-time student, or until the 7adult survivor becomes eligible for benefits under the federal 8Medicare health insurance program (Title XVIII of the Social 9Security Act, as added by Public Law 89-97). In the case of a 10survivor currently receiving occupational death benefits 11pursuant to the deceased employee's applicable retirement 12system or has received death benefits pursuant to the Workers' 13Compensation Act, who first became a survivor prior to January 141, 2022, the survivor is eligible for group health insurance 15benefits regardless of the deceased employee's minimum vesting 16requirements under the applicable retirement system, with a 17State contribution rate of 100%, until an unmarried child 18dependent reaches the age of 18, or the age of 22 if the 19dependent child is a full-time student, or until the adult 20survivor becomes eligible for benefits under the federal 21Medicare health insurance program (Title XVIII of the Social 22Security Act, as added by Public Law 89-97). The changes made 23by Public Act 102-714 with respect to survivors who first 24became survivors prior to January 1, 2022 shall apply upon 25request of the survivor on or after April 29, 2022 (the 26effective date of Public Act 102-714).   HB5036- 11 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    (m) "Optional coverages or benefits" means those coverages 2or benefits available to the member on his or her voluntary 3election, and at his or her own expense.4    (n) "Program" means the group life insurance, health 5benefits, and other employee benefits designed and contracted 6for by the Director under this Act.7    (o) "Health plan" means a health benefits program offered 8by the State of Illinois for persons eligible for the plan.9    (p) "Retired employee" means any person who would be an 10annuitant as that term is defined herein but for the fact that 11such person retired prior to January 1, 1966. Such term also 12includes any person formerly employed by the University of 13Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service who would be an 14annuitant but for the fact that such person was made 15ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 16System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 17Illinois Pension Code.18    (q) "Survivor" means a person receiving an annuity as a 19survivor of an employee or of an annuitant. "Survivor" also 20includes: (1) the surviving dependent of a person who 21satisfies the definition of "employee" except that such person 22is made ineligible to participate in the State Universities 23Retirement System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 2415-107 of the Illinois Pension Code; (2) the surviving 25dependent of any person formerly employed by the University of 26Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service who would be an   HB5036- 12 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1annuitant except for the fact that such person was made 2ineligible to participate in the State Universities Retirement 3System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 15-107 of the 4Illinois Pension Code; (3) the surviving dependent of a person 5who was an annuitant under this Act by virtue of receiving an 6alternative retirement cancellation payment under Section 714-108.5 of the Illinois Pension Code; and (4) a person who 8would be receiving an annuity as a survivor of an annuitant 9except that the annuitant elected on or after June 4, 2018 to 10receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under Section 1114-147.5, 15-185.5, or 16-190.5 of the Illinois Pension Code 12in lieu of receiving an annuity.13    (q-2) "SERS" means the State Employees' Retirement System 14of Illinois, created under Article 14 of the Illinois Pension 15Code. 16    (q-3) "SURS" means the State Universities Retirement 17System, created under Article 15 of the Illinois Pension Code. 18    (q-4) "TRS" means the Teachers' Retirement System of the 19State of Illinois, created under Article 16 of the Illinois 20Pension Code. 21    (q-5) (Blank). 22    (q-6) (Blank).23    (q-7) (Blank).24    (r) "Medical services" means the services provided within 25the scope of their licenses by practitioners in all categories 26licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.  HB5036- 13 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    (s) "Unit of local government" means any county, 2municipality, township, school district (including a 3combination of school districts under the Intergovernmental 4Cooperation Act), special district or other unit, designated 5as a unit of local government by law, which exercises limited 6governmental powers or powers in respect to limited 7governmental subjects, any not-for-profit association with a 8membership that primarily includes townships and township 9officials, that has duties that include provision of research 10service, dissemination of information, and other acts for the 11purpose of improving township government, and that is funded 12wholly or partly in accordance with Section 85-15 of the 13Township Code; any not-for-profit corporation or association, 14with a membership consisting primarily of municipalities, that 15operates its own utility system, and provides research, 16training, dissemination of information, or other acts to 17promote cooperation between and among municipalities that 18provide utility services and for the advancement of the goals 19and purposes of its membership; the Southern Illinois 20Collegiate Common Market, which is a consortium of higher 21education institutions in Southern Illinois; the Illinois 22Association of Park Districts; and any hospital provider that 23is owned by a county that has 100 or fewer hospital beds and 24has not already joined the program. "Qualified local 25government" means a unit of local government approved by the 26Director and participating in a program created under   HB5036- 14 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1subsection (i) of Section 10 of this Act.2    (t) "Qualified rehabilitation facility" means any 3not-for-profit organization that is accredited by the 4Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities or 5certified by the Department of Human Services (as successor to 6the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 7Disabilities) to provide services to persons with disabilities 8and which receives funds from the State of Illinois for 9providing those services, approved by the Director and 10participating in a program created under subsection (j) of 11Section 10 of this Act.12    (u) "Qualified domestic violence shelter or service" means 13any Illinois domestic violence shelter or service and its 14administrative offices funded by the Department of Human 15Services (as successor to the Illinois Department of Public 16Aid), approved by the Director and participating in a program 17created under subsection (k) of Section 10.18    (v) "TRS benefit recipient" means a person who:19        (1) is not a "member" as defined in this Section; and20        (2) is receiving a monthly benefit or retirement 21    annuity under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code or 22    would be receiving such monthly benefit or retirement 23    annuity except that the benefit recipient elected on or 24    after June 4, 2018 to receive an accelerated pension 25    benefit payment under Section 16-190.5 of the Illinois 26    Pension Code in lieu of receiving an annuity; and  HB5036- 15 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1        (3) either (i) has at least 8 years of creditable 2    service under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code, or 3    (ii) was enrolled in the health insurance program offered 4    under that Article on January 1, 1996, or (iii) is the 5    survivor of a benefit recipient who had at least 8 years of 6    creditable service under Article 16 of the Illinois 7    Pension Code or was enrolled in the health insurance 8    program offered under that Article on June 21, 1995 (the 9    effective date of Public Act 89-25), or (iv) is a 10    recipient or survivor of a recipient of a disability 11    benefit under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code.12    (w) "TRS dependent beneficiary" means a person who:13        (1) is not a "member" or "dependent" as defined in 14    this Section; and15        (2) is a TRS benefit recipient's: (A) spouse, (B) 16    dependent parent who is receiving at least half of his or 17    her support from the TRS benefit recipient, or (C) 18    natural, step, adjudicated, or adopted child who is (i) 19    under age 26, (ii) was, on January 1, 1996, participating 20    as a dependent beneficiary in the health insurance program 21    offered under Article 16 of the Illinois Pension Code, or 22    (iii) age 19 or over who has a mental or physical 23    disability from a cause originating prior to the age of 19 24    (age 26 if enrolled as an adult child).25    "TRS dependent beneficiary" does not include, as indicated 26under paragraph (2) of this subsection (w), a dependent of the   HB5036- 16 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1survivor of a TRS benefit recipient who first becomes a 2dependent of a survivor of a TRS benefit recipient on or after 3January 13, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-668) 4unless that dependent would have been eligible for coverage as 5a dependent of the deceased TRS benefit recipient upon whom 6the survivor benefit is based. 7    (x) "Military leave" refers to individuals in basic 8training for reserves, special/advanced training, annual 9training, emergency call up, activation by the President of 10the United States, or any other training or duty in service to 11the United States Armed Forces.12    (y) (Blank).13    (z) "Community college benefit recipient" means a person 14who:15        (1) is not a "member" as defined in this Section; and16        (2) is receiving a monthly survivor's annuity or 17    retirement annuity under Article 15 of the Illinois 18    Pension Code or would be receiving such monthly survivor's 19    annuity or retirement annuity except that the benefit 20    recipient elected on or after June 4, 2018 to receive an 21    accelerated pension benefit payment under Section 15-185.5 22    of the Illinois Pension Code in lieu of receiving an 23    annuity; and24        (3) either (i) was a full-time employee of a community 25    college district or an association of community college 26    boards created under the Public Community College Act   HB5036- 17 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    (other than an employee whose last employer under Article 2    15 of the Illinois Pension Code was a community college 3    district subject to Article VII of the Public Community 4    College Act) and was eligible to participate in a group 5    health benefit plan as an employee during the time of 6    employment with a community college district (other than a 7    community college district subject to Article VII of the 8    Public Community College Act) or an association of 9    community college boards, or (ii) is the survivor of a 10    person described in item (i).11    (aa) "Community college dependent beneficiary" means a 12person who:13        (1) is not a "member" or "dependent" as defined in 14    this Section; and15        (2) is a community college benefit recipient's: (A) 16    spouse, (B) dependent parent who is receiving at least 17    half of his or her support from the community college 18    benefit recipient, or (C) natural, step, adjudicated, or 19    adopted child who is (i) under age 26, or (ii) age 19 or 20    over and has a mental or physical disability from a cause 21    originating prior to the age of 19 (age 26 if enrolled as 22    an adult child).23    "Community college dependent beneficiary" does not 24include, as indicated under paragraph (2) of this subsection 25(aa), a dependent of the survivor of a community college 26benefit recipient who first becomes a dependent of a survivor   HB5036- 18 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1of a community college benefit recipient on or after January 213, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-668) unless that 3dependent would have been eligible for coverage as a dependent 4of the deceased community college benefit recipient upon whom 5the survivor annuity is based. 6    (bb) "Qualified child advocacy center" means any Illinois 7child advocacy center and its administrative offices funded by 8the Department of Children and Family Services, as defined by 9the Children's Advocacy Center Act, approved by the Director 10and participating in a program created under subsection (n) of 11Section 10. 12    (cc) "Placement for adoption" means the assumption and 13retention by a member of a legal obligation for total or 14partial support of a child in anticipation of adoption of the 15child. The child's placement with the member terminates upon 16the termination of such legal obligation. 17(Source: P.A. 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 18    (5 ILCS 375/8)  (from Ch. 127, par. 528)19    Sec. 8. Eligibility. 20    (a) Each employee eligible under the provisions of this 21Act and any rules and regulations promulgated and adopted 22hereunder by the Director shall become immediately eligible 23and covered for all benefits available under the programs. 24Employees electing coverage for eligible dependents shall have 25the coverage effective immediately, provided that the election   HB5036- 19 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1is properly filed in accordance with required filing dates and 2procedures specified by the Director, including the completion 3and submission of all documentation and forms required by the 4Director.5        (1) Every member originally eligible to elect 6    dependent coverage, but not electing it during the 7    original eligibility period, may subsequently obtain 8    dependent coverage only in the event of a qualifying 9    change in status, special enrollment, special circumstance 10    as defined by the Director, or during the annual Benefit 11    Choice Period.12        (2) Members described above being transferred from 13    previous coverage towards which the State has been 14    contributing shall be transferred regardless of 15    preexisting conditions, waiting periods, or other 16    requirements that might jeopardize claim payments to which 17    they would otherwise have been entitled.18        (3) Eligible and covered members that are eligible for 19    coverage as dependents except for the fact of being 20    members shall be transferred to, and covered under, 21    dependent status regardless of preexisting conditions, 22    waiting periods, or other requirements that might 23    jeopardize claim payments to which they would otherwise 24    have been entitled upon cessation of member status and the 25    election of dependent coverage by a member eligible to 26    elect that coverage.  HB5036- 20 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    (b) New employees shall be immediately insured for the 2basic group life insurance and covered by the program of 3health benefits on the first day of active State service. 4Optional life insurance coverage one to 4 times the basic 5amount, if elected during the relevant eligibility period, 6will become effective on the date of employment. Optional life 7insurance coverage exceeding 4 times the basic amount and all 8life insurance amounts applied for after the eligibility 9period will be effective, subject to satisfactory evidence of 10insurability when applicable, or other necessary 11qualifications, pursuant to the requirements of the applicable 12benefit program, unless there is a change in status that would 13confer new eligibility for change of enrollment under rules 14established supplementing this Act, in which event application 15must be made within the new eligibility period.16    (c) As to the group health benefits program contracted to 17begin or continue after June 30, 1973, each annuitant, 18survivor, and retired employee shall become immediately 19eligible for all benefits available under that program. Each 20annuitant, survivor, and retired employee shall have coverage 21effective immediately, provided that the election is properly 22filed in accordance with the required filing dates and 23procedures specified by the Director, including the completion 24and submission of all documentation and forms required by the 25Director. Annuitants, survivors, and retired employees may 26elect coverage for eligible dependents and shall have the   HB5036- 21 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1coverage effective immediately, provided that the election is 2properly filed in accordance with required filing dates and 3procedures specified by the Director, except that, for a 4survivor, the dependent sought to be added on or after the 5effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 6Assembly must have been eligible for coverage as a dependent 7under the deceased member upon whom the survivor's annuity is 8based in order to be eligible for coverage under the survivor.9    Except as otherwise provided in this Act, where spouses 10husband and wife are both eligible members, each shall be 11enrolled as a member and coverage on their eligible dependent 12children, if any, may be under the enrollment and election of 13either. However, if both spouses are eligible members and are 14also employees under Article 14 of the Illinois Pension Code, 15then one spouse and only one spouse may elect to enroll the 16other spouse in the program of group health benefits as an 17eligible dependent if:18        (1) both spouses provide to the Department of Central 19    Management Services, upon the request of the Department of 20    Central Management Services, an attestation that the 21    member and the member's spouse have elected for the spouse 22    to be enrolled as a dependent; and23        (2) the spouses continue to be married. 24Upon electing to enroll in the program of group health 25benefits as an eligible dependent under this paragraph, a 26member forfeits his or her rights as a member under this Act   HB5036- 22 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1with respect to the program of group health benefits during 2the period when that election is in effect. 3    Regardless of other provisions herein regarding late 4enrollment or other qualifications, as appropriate, the 5Director may periodically authorize open enrollment periods 6for each of the benefit programs at which time each member may 7elect enrollment or change of enrollment without regard to 8age, sex, health, or other qualification under the conditions 9as may be prescribed in rules and regulations supplementing 10this Act. Special open enrollment periods may be declared by 11the Director for certain members only when special 12circumstances occur that affect only those members.13    (d) Eligible members may elect not to participate in the 14program of health benefits as defined in this Act. The 15election must be made during the annual benefit choice period 16or upon showing a qualifying change in status as defined in the 17U.S. Internal Revenue Code, subject to the conditions in this 18subsection.19        (1) (Blank).20        (2) Members may re-enroll in the Department of Central 21    Management Services program of health benefits upon 22    showing a qualifying change in status, as defined in the 23    U.S. Internal Revenue Code, without evidence of 24    insurability and with no limitations on coverage for 25    pre-existing conditions.26        (3) Members may also re-enroll in the program of   HB5036- 23 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    health benefits during any annual benefit choice period, 2    without evidence of insurability.3        (4) Members who elect not to participate in the 4    program of health benefits shall be furnished a written 5    explanation of the requirements and limitations for the 6    election not to participate in the program and for 7    re-enrolling in the program. The explanation shall also be 8    included in the annual benefit choice options booklets 9    furnished to members.10    (d-5) Beginning July 1, 2005, the Director may establish a 11program of financial incentives to encourage annuitants 12receiving a retirement annuity, but who are not eligible for 13benefits under the federal Medicare health insurance program 14(Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, as added by Public Law 1589-97) to elect not to participate in the program of health 16benefits provided under this Act. The election by an annuitant 17not to participate under this program must be made in 18accordance with the requirements set forth under subsection 19(d). The financial incentives provided to these annuitants 20under the program may not exceed $150 per month for each 21annuitant electing not to participate in the program of health 22benefits provided under this Act. 23    (d-6) Beginning July 1, 2013, the Director may establish a 24program of financial incentives to encourage annuitants with 2520 or more years of creditable service but who are not eligible 26for benefits under the federal Medicare health insurance   HB5036- 24 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1program (Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, as added by 2Public Law 89-97) to elect not to participate in the program of 3health benefits provided under this Act. The election by an 4annuitant not to participate under this program must be made 5in accordance with the requirements set forth under subsection 6(d). The program established under this subsection (d-6) may 7include a prorated incentive for annuitants with fewer than 20 8years of creditable service, as determined by the Director. 9The financial incentives provided to these annuitants under 10this program may not exceed $500 per month for each annuitant 11electing not to participate in the program of health benefits 12provided under this Act. 13    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or the 14rules adopted under this Act, if a person participating in the 15program of health benefits as the dependent spouse of an 16eligible member becomes an annuitant, the person may elect, at 17the time of becoming an annuitant or during any subsequent 18annual benefit choice period, to continue participation as a 19dependent rather than as an eligible member for as long as the 20person continues to be an eligible dependent. In order to be 21eligible to make such an election, the person must have been 22enrolled as a dependent under the program of health benefits 23for no less than one year prior to becoming an annuitant. 24    An eligible member who has elected to participate as a 25dependent may re-enroll in the program of health benefits as 26an eligible member (i) during any subsequent annual benefit   HB5036- 25 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1choice period or (ii) upon showing a qualifying change in 2status, as defined in the U.S. Internal Revenue Code, without 3evidence of insurability and with no limitations on coverage 4for pre-existing conditions.5    A person who elects to participate in the program of 6health benefits as a dependent rather than as an eligible 7member shall be furnished a written explanation of the 8consequences of electing to participate as a dependent and the 9conditions and procedures for re-enrolling as an eligible 10member. The explanation shall also be included in the annual 11benefit choice options booklet furnished to members.12(Source: P.A. 102-19, eff. 7-1-21.) 13    (5 ILCS 375/9)  (from Ch. 127, par. 529)14    Sec. 9. (a) The eligible member shall be responsible for 15his or her portion of the premiums, charges or other fees for 16all elected coverages or benefits, which shall be paid by 17means of the acceptance of a reduction in earnings or the 18foregoing of an increase in earnings by an employee; provided, 19however, subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the 20Department, the eligible member may make personal payment of 21the premium, charge or fee for any wellness programs 22implemented under the program of health benefits. All 23contributions and payments by the eligible members and the 24State for all elected coverages and benefits shall be 25deposited in the Health Insurance Reserve Fund. The Department   HB5036- 26 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1may determine the aggregate level of contribution required 2under this Section on the basis of actual cost of services 3adjusted for age, sex or the geographical or other demographic 4characteristics which affect costs of the benefit.5    (b) If a member is not entitled to receive any salary, 6wages or other compensation during a period in which premiums, 7charges or other fees are due or does not receive compensation 8sufficient to allow deduction of the required payment of the 9premium, charge or other fee, such member may continue the 10contributory benefit in effect by making personal payment of 11the premium, charge or other fee for the period in such manner, 12in such amount, and for such duration, as may be prescribed in 13rules and regulations promulgated for the administration of 14this Act.15    (c) If an eligible member elects coverage as a dependent 16under subsection (c) of Section 8, the premium or charge 17applicable to dependent coverage shall apply rather than the 18premium or charge applicable to a member. The Department shall 19ensure that the State's aggregate contribution for such 20individual does not exceed the contribution that would have 21applied had the individual enrolled as a member. 22(Source: P.A. 91-390, eff. 7-30-99.) 23    (5 ILCS 375/10)  (from Ch. 127, par. 530)24    Sec. 10. Contributions by the State and members. 25    (a) The State shall pay the cost of basic non-contributory   HB5036- 27 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1group life insurance and, subject to member paid contributions 2set by the Department or required by this Section and except as 3provided in this Section, the basic program of group health 4benefits on each eligible member, except a member, not 5otherwise covered by this Act, who has retired as a 6participating member under Article 2 of the Illinois Pension 7Code but is ineligible for the retirement annuity under 8Section 2-119 of the Illinois Pension Code, and part of each 9eligible member's and retired member's premiums for health 10insurance coverage for enrolled dependents as provided by 11Section 9. The State shall pay the cost of the basic program of 12group health benefits only after benefits are reduced by the 13amount of benefits covered by Medicare for all members and 14dependents who are eligible for benefits under Social Security 15or the Railroad Retirement system or who had sufficient 16Medicare-covered government employment, except that such 17reduction in benefits shall apply only to those members and 18dependents who (1) first become eligible for such Medicare 19coverage on or after July 1, 1992; or (2) are 20Medicare-eligible members or dependents of a local government 21unit which began participation in the program on or after July 221, 1992; or (3) remain eligible for, but no longer receive 23Medicare coverage which they had been receiving on or after 24July 1, 1992. The Department may determine the aggregate level 25of the State's contribution on the basis of actual cost of 26medical services adjusted for age, sex or geographic or other   HB5036- 28 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1demographic characteristics which affect the costs of such 2programs.3    The cost of participation in the basic program of group 4health benefits for the dependent or survivor of a living or 5deceased retired employee who was formerly employed by the 6University of Illinois in the Cooperative Extension Service 7and would be an annuitant but for the fact that he or she was 8made ineligible to participate in the State Universities 9Retirement System by clause (4) of subsection (a) of Section 1015-107 of the Illinois Pension Code shall not be greater than 11the cost of participation that would otherwise apply to that 12dependent or survivor if he or she were the dependent or 13survivor of an annuitant under the State Universities 14Retirement System.15    (a-1) (Blank). 16    (a-2) (Blank).17    (a-3) (Blank).18    (a-4) (Blank).19    (a-5) (Blank).20    (a-6) (Blank).21    (a-7) (Blank).22    (a-8) Any annuitant, survivor, or retired employee may 23waive or terminate coverage in the program of group health 24benefits. Any such annuitant, survivor, or retired employee 25who has waived or terminated coverage may enroll or re-enroll 26in the program of group health benefits only during the annual   HB5036- 29 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1benefit choice period, as determined by the Director; except 2that in the event of termination of coverage due to nonpayment 3of premiums, the annuitant, survivor, or retired employee may 4not re-enroll in the program.5    (a-8.3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 6Section, the Department shall not require an employee who is 7authorized to elect and has elected to become a dependent 8under subsection (c) of Section 8 to make contributions as a 9member under this Section during the period when that election 10is in effect. 11    (a-8.5) Beginning on July 1, 2012 (the effective date of 12Public Act 97-695), the Director of Central Management 13Services shall, on an annual basis, determine the amount that 14the State shall contribute toward the basic program of group 15health benefits on behalf of annuitants (including individuals 16who (i) participated in the General Assembly Retirement 17System, the State Employees' Retirement System of Illinois, 18the State Universities Retirement System, the Teachers' 19Retirement System of the State of Illinois, or the Judges 20Retirement System of Illinois and (ii) qualify as annuitants 21under subsection (b) of Section 3 of this Act), survivors 22(including individuals who (i) receive an annuity as a 23survivor of an individual who participated in the General 24Assembly Retirement System, the State Employees' Retirement 25System of Illinois, the State Universities Retirement System, 26the Teachers' Retirement System of the State of Illinois, or   HB5036- 30 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1the Judges Retirement System of Illinois and (ii) qualify as 2survivors under subsection (q) of Section 3 of this Act), and 3retired employees (as defined in subsection (p) of Section 3 4of this Act). The remainder of the cost of coverage for each 5annuitant, survivor, or retired employee, as determined by the 6Director of Central Management Services, shall be the 7responsibility of that annuitant, survivor, or retired 8employee.9    Contributions required of annuitants, survivors, and 10retired employees shall be the same for all retirement systems 11and shall also be based on whether an individual has made an 12election under Section 15-135.1 of the Illinois Pension Code. 13Contributions may be based on annuitants', survivors', or 14retired employees' Medicare eligibility, but may not be based 15on Social Security eligibility.16    (a-9) No later than May 1 of each calendar year, the 17Director of Central Management Services shall certify in 18writing to the Executive Secretary of the State Employees' 19Retirement System of Illinois the amounts of the Medicare 20supplement health care premiums and the amounts of the health 21care premiums for all other retirees who are not Medicare 22eligible.23    A separate calculation of the premiums based upon the 24actual cost of each health care plan shall be so certified.25    The Director of Central Management Services shall provide 26to the Executive Secretary of the State Employees' Retirement   HB5036- 31 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1System of Illinois such information, statistics, and other 2data as he or she may require to review the premium amounts 3certified by the Director of Central Management Services.4    The Department of Central Management Services, or any 5successor agency designated to procure health care contracts 6pursuant to this Act, is authorized to establish funds, 7separate accounts provided by any bank or banks as defined by 8the Illinois Banking Act, or separate accounts provided by any 9savings and loan association or associations as defined by the 10Illinois Savings and Loan Act of 1985 to be held by the 11Director, outside the State treasury, for the purpose of 12receiving the transfer of moneys from the Local Government 13Health Insurance Reserve Fund. The Department may promulgate 14rules further defining the methodology for the transfers. Any 15interest earned by moneys in the funds or accounts shall inure 16to the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund. The 17transferred moneys, and interest accrued thereon, shall be 18used exclusively for transfers to administrative service 19organizations or their financial institutions for payments of 20claims to claimants and providers under the self-insurance 21health plan. The transferred moneys, and interest accrued 22thereon, shall not be used for any other purpose including, 23but not limited to, reimbursement of administration fees due 24the administrative service organization pursuant to its 25contract or contracts with the Department. 26    (a-10) To the extent that participation, benefits, or   HB5036- 32 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1premiums under this Act are based on a person's service credit 2under an Article of the Illinois Pension Code, service credit 3terminated in exchange for an accelerated pension benefit 4payment under Section 14-147.5, 15-185.5, or 16-190.5 of that 5Code shall be included in determining a person's service 6credit for the purposes of this Act. 7    (b) State employees who become eligible for this program 8on or after January 1, 1980 in positions normally requiring 9actual performance of duty not less than 1/2 of a normal work 10period but not equal to that of a normal work period, shall be 11given the option of participating in the available program. If 12the employee elects coverage, the State shall contribute on 13behalf of such employee to the cost of the employee's benefit 14and any applicable dependent supplement, that sum which bears 15the same percentage as that percentage of time the employee 16regularly works when compared to normal work period.17    (c) The basic non-contributory coverage from the basic 18program of group health benefits shall be continued for each 19employee not in pay status or on active service by reason of 20(1) leave of absence due to illness or injury, (2) authorized 21educational leave of absence or sabbatical leave, or (3) 22military leave. This coverage shall continue until expiration 23of authorized leave and return to active service, but not to 24exceed 24 months for leaves under item (1) or (2). This 2524-month limitation and the requirement of returning to active 26service shall not apply to persons receiving ordinary or   HB5036- 33 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1accidental disability benefits or retirement benefits through 2the appropriate State retirement system or benefits under the 3Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 4Diseases Act.5    (d) The basic group life insurance coverage shall 6continue, with full State contribution, where such person is 7(1) absent from active service by reason of disability arising 8from any cause other than self-inflicted, (2) on authorized 9educational leave of absence or sabbatical leave, or (3) on 10military leave.11    (e) Where the person is in non-pay status for a period in 12excess of 30 days or on leave of absence, other than by reason 13of disability, educational or sabbatical leave, or military 14leave, such person may continue coverage only by making 15personal payment equal to the amount normally contributed by 16the State on such person's behalf. Such payments and coverage 17may be continued: (1) until such time as the person returns to 18a status eligible for coverage at State expense, but not to 19exceed 24 months or (2) until such person's employment or 20annuitant status with the State is terminated (exclusive of 21any additional service imposed pursuant to law).22    (f) The Department shall establish by rule the extent to 23which other employee benefits will continue for persons in 24non-pay status or who are not in active service.25    (g) The State shall not pay the cost of the basic 26non-contributory group life insurance, program of health   HB5036- 34 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1benefits and other employee benefits for members who are 2survivors as defined by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection 3(q) of Section 3 of this Act. The costs of benefits for these 4survivors shall be paid by the survivors or by the University 5of Illinois Cooperative Extension Service, or any combination 6thereof. However, the State shall pay the amount of the 7reduction in the cost of participation, if any, resulting from 8the amendment to subsection (a) made by Public Act 91-617.9    (h) Those persons occupying positions with any department 10as a result of emergency appointments pursuant to Section 8b.8 11of the Personnel Code who are not considered employees under 12this Act shall be given the option of participating in the 13programs of group life insurance, health benefits and other 14employee benefits. Such persons electing coverage may 15participate only by making payment equal to the amount 16normally contributed by the State for similarly situated 17employees. Such amounts shall be determined by the Director. 18Such payments and coverage may be continued until such time as 19the person becomes an employee pursuant to this Act or such 20person's appointment is terminated.21    (i) Any unit of local government within the State of 22Illinois may apply to the Director to have its employees, 23annuitants, and their dependents provided group health 24coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. To 25participate, a unit of local government must agree to enroll 26all of its employees, who may select coverage under any group   HB5036- 35 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1health benefits plan made available by the Department under 2the health benefits program established under this Section or 3a health maintenance organization that has contracted with the 4State to be available as a health care provider for employees 5as defined in this Act. A unit of local government must remit 6the entire cost of providing coverage under the health 7benefits program established under this Section or, for 8coverage under a health maintenance organization, an amount 9determined by the Director based on an analysis of the sex, 10age, geographic location, or other relevant demographic 11variables for its employees, except that the unit of local 12government shall not be required to enroll those of its 13employees who are covered spouses or dependents under the 14State group health benefits plan or another group policy or 15plan providing health benefits as long as (1) an appropriate 16official from the unit of local government attests that each 17employee not enrolled is a covered spouse or dependent under 18this plan or another group policy or plan, and (2) at least 50% 19of the employees are enrolled and the unit of local government 20remits the entire cost of providing coverage to those 21employees, except that a participating school district must 22have enrolled at least 50% of its full-time employees who have 23not waived coverage under the district's group health plan by 24participating in a component of the district's cafeteria plan. 25A participating school district is not required to enroll a 26full-time employee who has waived coverage under the   HB5036- 36 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1district's health plan, provided that an appropriate official 2from the participating school district attests that the 3full-time employee has waived coverage by participating in a 4component of the district's cafeteria plan. For the purposes 5of this subsection, "participating school district" includes a 6unit of local government whose primary purpose is education as 7defined by the Department's rules.8    Employees of a participating unit of local government who 9are not enrolled due to coverage under another group health 10policy or plan may enroll in the event of a qualifying change 11in status, special enrollment, special circumstance as defined 12by the Director, or during the annual benefit choice period. A 13participating unit of local government may also elect to cover 14its annuitants. Dependent coverage shall be offered on an 15optional basis, with the costs paid by the unit of local 16government, its employees, or some combination of the two as 17determined by the unit of local government. The unit of local 18government shall be responsible for timely collection and 19transmission of dependent premiums.20    The Director shall annually determine monthly rates of 21payment, subject to the following constraints:22        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 23    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 24    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents 25    coverages or other contributory coverages, or contributed 26    by the State for basic insurance coverages on behalf of   HB5036- 37 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    its employees, adjusted for differences between State 2    employees and employees of the local government in age, 3    sex, geographic location or other relevant demographic 4    variables, plus an amount sufficient to pay for the 5    additional administrative costs of providing coverage to 6    employees of the unit of local government and their 7    dependents.8        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 9    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 10    of the employees of the unit of local government.11    In the case of coverage of local government employees 12under a health maintenance organization, the Director shall 13annually determine for each participating unit of local 14government the maximum monthly amount the unit may contribute 15toward that coverage, based on an analysis of (i) the age, sex, 16geographic location, and other relevant demographic variables 17of the unit's employees and (ii) the cost to cover those 18employees under the State group health benefits plan. The 19Director may similarly determine the maximum monthly amount 20each unit of local government may contribute toward coverage 21of its employees' dependents under a health maintenance 22organization.23    Monthly payments by the unit of local government or its 24employees for group health benefits plan or health maintenance 25organization coverage shall be deposited into the Local 26Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund.  HB5036- 38 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    The Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund is 2hereby created as a nonappropriated trust fund to be held 3outside the State treasury, with the State Treasurer as 4custodian. The Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund 5shall be a continuing fund not subject to fiscal year 6limitations. The Local Government Health Insurance Reserve 7Fund is not subject to administrative charges or charge-backs, 8including, but not limited to, those authorized under Section 98h of the State Finance Act. All revenues arising from the 10administration of the health benefits program established 11under this Section shall be deposited into the Local 12Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund. Any interest earned 13on moneys in the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve 14Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. All expenditures from 15this Fund shall be used for payments for health care benefits 16for local government and rehabilitation facility employees, 17annuitants, and dependents, and to reimburse the Department or 18its administrative service organization for all expenses 19incurred in the administration of benefits. No other State 20funds may be used for these purposes.21    A local government employer's participation or desire to 22participate in a program created under this subsection shall 23not limit that employer's duty to bargain with the 24representative of any collective bargaining unit of its 25employees.26    (j) Any rehabilitation facility within the State of   HB5036- 39 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1Illinois may apply to the Director to have its employees, 2annuitants, and their eligible dependents provided group 3health coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. To 4participate, a rehabilitation facility must agree to enroll 5all of its employees and remit the entire cost of providing 6such coverage for its employees, except that the 7rehabilitation facility shall not be required to enroll those 8of its employees who are covered spouses or dependents under 9this plan or another group policy or plan providing health 10benefits as long as (1) an appropriate official from the 11rehabilitation facility attests that each employee not 12enrolled is a covered spouse or dependent under this plan or 13another group policy or plan, and (2) at least 50% of the 14employees are enrolled and the rehabilitation facility remits 15the entire cost of providing coverage to those employees. 16Employees of a participating rehabilitation facility who are 17not enrolled due to coverage under another group health policy 18or plan may enroll in the event of a qualifying change in 19status, special enrollment, special circumstance as defined by 20the Director, or during the annual benefit choice period. A 21participating rehabilitation facility may also elect to cover 22its annuitants. Dependent coverage shall be offered on an 23optional basis, with the costs paid by the rehabilitation 24facility, its employees, or some combination of the 2 as 25determined by the rehabilitation facility. The rehabilitation 26facility shall be responsible for timely collection and   HB5036- 40 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1transmission of dependent premiums.2    The Director shall annually determine quarterly rates of 3payment, subject to the following constraints:4        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 5    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 6    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents 7    coverages or other contributory coverages on behalf of its 8    employees, adjusted for differences between State 9    employees and employees of the rehabilitation facility in 10    age, sex, geographic location or other relevant 11    demographic variables, plus an amount sufficient to pay 12    for the additional administrative costs of providing 13    coverage to employees of the rehabilitation facility and 14    their dependents.15        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 16    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 17    of the employees of the rehabilitation facility.18    Monthly payments by the rehabilitation facility or its 19employees for group health benefits shall be deposited into 20the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund.21    (k) Any domestic violence shelter or service within the 22State of Illinois may apply to the Director to have its 23employees, annuitants, and their dependents provided group 24health coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. To 25participate, a domestic violence shelter or service must agree 26to enroll all of its employees and pay the entire cost of   HB5036- 41 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1providing such coverage for its employees. The domestic 2violence shelter shall not be required to enroll those of its 3employees who are covered spouses or dependents under this 4plan or another group policy or plan providing health benefits 5as long as (1) an appropriate official from the domestic 6violence shelter attests that each employee not enrolled is a 7covered spouse or dependent under this plan or another group 8policy or plan and (2) at least 50% of the employees are 9enrolled and the domestic violence shelter remits the entire 10cost of providing coverage to those employees. Employees of a 11participating domestic violence shelter who are not enrolled 12due to coverage under another group health policy or plan may 13enroll in the event of a qualifying change in status, special 14enrollment, or special circumstance as defined by the Director 15or during the annual benefit choice period. A participating 16domestic violence shelter may also elect to cover its 17annuitants. Dependent coverage shall be offered on an optional 18basis, with employees, or some combination of the 2 as 19determined by the domestic violence shelter or service. The 20domestic violence shelter or service shall be responsible for 21timely collection and transmission of dependent premiums.22    The Director shall annually determine rates of payment, 23subject to the following constraints:24        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 25    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 26    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents   HB5036- 42 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    coverages or other contributory coverages on behalf of its 2    employees, adjusted for differences between State 3    employees and employees of the domestic violence shelter 4    or service in age, sex, geographic location or other 5    relevant demographic variables, plus an amount sufficient 6    to pay for the additional administrative costs of 7    providing coverage to employees of the domestic violence 8    shelter or service and their dependents.9        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 10    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 11    of the employees of the domestic violence shelter or 12    service.13    Monthly payments by the domestic violence shelter or 14service or its employees for group health insurance shall be 15deposited into the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve 16Fund.17    (l) A public community college or entity organized 18pursuant to the Public Community College Act may apply to the 19Director initially to have only annuitants not covered prior 20to July 1, 1992 by the district's health plan provided health 21coverage under this Act on a non-insured basis. The community 22college must execute a 2-year contract to participate in the 23Local Government Health Plan. Any annuitant may enroll in the 24event of a qualifying change in status, special enrollment, 25special circumstance as defined by the Director, or during the 26annual benefit choice period.  HB5036- 43 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    The Director shall annually determine monthly rates of 2payment subject to the following constraints: for those 3community colleges with annuitants only enrolled, first year 4rates shall be equal to the average cost to cover claims for a 5State member adjusted for demographics, Medicare 6participation, and other factors; and in the second year, a 7further adjustment of rates shall be made to reflect the 8actual first year's claims experience of the covered 9annuitants.10    (l-5) The provisions of subsection (l) become inoperative 11on July 1, 1999.12    (m) The Director shall adopt any rules deemed necessary 13for implementation of this amendatory Act of 1989 (Public Act 1486-978).15    (n) Any child advocacy center within the State of Illinois 16may apply to the Director to have its employees, annuitants, 17and their dependents provided group health coverage under this 18Act on a non-insured basis. To participate, a child advocacy 19center must agree to enroll all of its employees and pay the 20entire cost of providing coverage for its employees. The child 21advocacy center shall not be required to enroll those of its 22employees who are covered spouses or dependents under this 23plan or another group policy or plan providing health benefits 24as long as (1) an appropriate official from the child advocacy 25center attests that each employee not enrolled is a covered 26spouse or dependent under this plan or another group policy or   HB5036- 44 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1plan and (2) at least 50% of the employees are enrolled and the 2child advocacy center remits the entire cost of providing 3coverage to those employees. Employees of a participating 4child advocacy center who are not enrolled due to coverage 5under another group health policy or plan may enroll in the 6event of a qualifying change in status, special enrollment, or 7special circumstance as defined by the Director or during the 8annual benefit choice period. A participating child advocacy 9center may also elect to cover its annuitants. Dependent 10coverage shall be offered on an optional basis, with the costs 11paid by the child advocacy center, its employees, or some 12combination of the 2 as determined by the child advocacy 13center. The child advocacy center shall be responsible for 14timely collection and transmission of dependent premiums.15    The Director shall annually determine rates of payment, 16subject to the following constraints:17        (1) In the first year of coverage, the rates shall be 18    equal to the amount normally charged to State employees 19    for elected optional coverages or for enrolled dependents 20    coverages or other contributory coverages on behalf of its 21    employees, adjusted for differences between State 22    employees and employees of the child advocacy center in 23    age, sex, geographic location, or other relevant 24    demographic variables, plus an amount sufficient to pay 25    for the additional administrative costs of providing 26    coverage to employees of the child advocacy center and   HB5036- 45 -LRB104 17785 RPS 31217 b1    their dependents.2        (2) In subsequent years, a further adjustment shall be 3    made to reflect the actual prior years' claims experience 4    of the employees of the child advocacy center.5    Monthly payments by the child advocacy center or its 6employees for group health insurance shall be deposited into 7the Local Government Health Insurance Reserve Fund.8(Source: P.A. 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)